Hawaii statutes.
[§667-101] Affidavit after public sale;
contents. (a) After the public sale is held, the association shall sign
an affidavit under penalty of perjury:

(1) Stating that the power of sale
foreclosure was made pursuant to the power of sale provision in the law or
association documents;

(2) Stating that the power of sale
foreclosure was conducted as required by this part;

(3) Summarizing what was done by the
association;

(4) Attaching a copy of the recorded notice
of default and intention to foreclose; and

(5) Attaching a copy of the last public
notice of the public sale.

(b) The recitals in the affidavit required
under subsection (a) may, but need not, be substantially in the following form:

"(1) I am duly authorized to represent or act
on behalf of ____________________ (name of association)
("association") regarding the following power of sale foreclosure. I
am signing this affidavit in accordance with the alternate power of sale
foreclosure law (Chapter 667, Part VI, Hawaii Revised
Statutes);

(2) The association is an "association" as defined in the power of sale
foreclosure law;

(3) The power of sale foreclosure is of an association lien. If the lien was recorded, the lien was
dated ____________________, and recorded in the
____________________ (bureau of conveyances or office of the assistant
registrar of the land court) as ____________________ (recordation
information). The unit is located at: ____________________ (address or
description of location) and is identified by tax map key number:
____________________. The legal description of the property, including
the certificate of title or transfer certificate of title number if registered
with the land court, is attached as Exhibit "A";

(4) Pursuant to the power of sale provision
of law or association documents, the power of sale foreclosure was
conducted as required by the power of sale foreclosure law. The following is a
summary of what was done:

(A) A notice of default and intention to
foreclose was served on the unit owner and the following person:
____________________. The notice of default and intention to foreclose was
served on the following date and in the following manner:
____________________;

(B) The date of the notice of default and
intention to foreclose was ____________________ (date). The deadline in the
notice for curing the default was ____________________ (date), which deadline
date was at least sixty days after the date of the notice;

(C) The notice of default and intention to
foreclose was recorded before the deadline date in the ____________________
(bureau of conveyances or office of the assistant registrar of the land
court). The notice was recorded on ____________________ (date) as document no.
____________________. A copy of the recorded notice is attached as Exhibit
"1";

(D) The default was not cured by the deadline
date in the notice of default and intention to foreclose;

(E) A public notice of the public sale was
initially published in the classified section of the ____________________, in
accordance with section 667-96(d), Hawaii Revised Statutes, once each week for
three consecutive weeks on the following dates: ____________________. A copy
of the affidavit of publication for the last public notice of the public sale
is attached as Exhibit "2". The date of the public sale was
____________________ (date). The last publication was not less than fourteen
days before the date of the public sale;

(F) The public notice of the public sale was
sent to the unit owner, to the state director of taxation, to the director of
finance of the county where the unit is located, and to the following:
____________________. The public notice was sent on the following dates and in
the following manner: ____________________. Those dates were after the
deadline date in the notice of default and intention to foreclose, and those
dates were at least sixty days before the date of the public sale;

(G) The public notice of the public sale was
posted on the unit or on such other real property of which the unit is a part
on ____________________ (date). That date was at least sixty days before the
date of the public sale;

(H) A public sale of the unit was held on a
business day during business hours on: __________________ (date), at
____________________ (time), at the following location: ____________________.
The highest successful bidder was ____________________ (name) with the highest
successful bid price of $____________________; and

(I) At the time the public sale was held, the
default was not cured; and

(5) This affidavit is signed under penalty
of perjury."

[L 2012, c 182, pt of §3(2)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next